Utah statutes.
48-2e-1132.   Plan of interest exchange.

(1)  A domestic limited partnership may be the acquired entity in an interest exchange under Sections 48-2e-1131 through 48-2e-1136 by approving a plan of interest exchange.  The plan must be in a record and contain:

(a)  the name of the acquired entity;

(b)  the name, jurisdiction of formation, and type of entity of the acquiring entity;

(c)  the manner of converting the interests in the acquired entity into interests, securities, obligations, money, other property, rights to acquire interests or securities, or any combination of the foregoing;

(d)  any proposed amendments to the certificate of limited partnership or partnership agreement that are, or are proposed to be, in a record of the acquired entity;

(e)  the other terms and conditions of the interest exchange; and

(f)  any other provision required by the law of this state or the partnership agreement of the acquired entity.

(2)  In addition to the requirements of Subsection (1), a plan of interest exchange may contain any other provision not prohibited by law.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

